Hawaii statutes.
[§339D-22] Television manufacturers.
(a) No television manufacturer shall sell or offer for sale any new covered
television in this State unless:

(1) The covered television is labeled with a brand,
whether licensed or owned, and the label is permanently affixed; and

(2) The brand is included in a registration that is
filed with the department and that is effective pursuant to subsection (b).

(b) By January 1, 2010, before selling or
offering for sale any covered television in the State, each television
manufacturer shall register with the department and pay to the department a
registration fee of $2,500. Thereafter, if a television manufacturer has not
previously registered, the television manufacturer shall register with the
department prior to any offer for sale for delivery in this State of the
television manufacturer's new covered televisions.

(c) Each television manufacturer who is
registered shall submit an annual renewal of its registration and payment of a
registration fee of $2,500 to the department by January 1 of each program year.

(d) The registration and each renewal shall
include a list of all of the television manufacturer's brands of covered
televisions and shall be effective on the second day of the succeeding month
after receipt by the department of the registration or renewal.

(e) A television manufacturer shall provide
the department with contact information for the television manufacturer's
designated agent or employee whom the department may contact for information on
the television manufacturer's compliance with the requirements of this section.
[L 2009, c 183, pt of §6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next